Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.46.060

Crimes included in harassment.

As used in this chapter, "harassment" may include but is not limited to any of the following crimes:

(1) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020);

(2) Hate crime (RCW 9A.36.080);

(3) Telephone harassment (RCW 9.61.230);

(4) Assault in the first degree (RCW 9A.36.011);

(5) Assault of a child in the first degree (RCW 9A.36.120);

(6) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021);

(7) Assault of a child in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.130);

(8) Assault in the fourth degree (RCW 9A.36.041);

(9) Reckless endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);

(10) Extortion in the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120);

(11) Extortion in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.130);

(12) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);

(13) Burglary in the first degree (RCW 9A.52.020);

(14) Burglary in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.030);

(15) Criminal trespass in the first degree (RCW 9A.52.070);

(16) Criminal trespass in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.080);

(17) Malicious mischief in the first degree (RCW 9A.48.070);

(18) Malicious mischief in the second degree (RCW 9A.48.080);

(19) Malicious mischief in the third degree (RCW 9A.48.090);

(20) Kidnapping in the first degree (RCW 9A.40.020);

(21) Kidnapping in the second degree (RCW 9A.40.030);

(22) Unlawful imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040);

(23) Rape in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.040);

(24) Rape in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.050);

(25) Rape in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.060);

(26) Indecent liberties (RCW 9A.44.100);

(27) Rape of a child in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.073);

(28) Rape of a child in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.076);

(29) Rape of a child in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.079);

(30) Child molestation in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.083);

(31) Child molestation in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.086);

(32) Child molestation in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.089);

(33) Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110);

(34) Cyber harassment (RCW 9A.90.120);

(35) Residential burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);

(36) Violation of a temporary, permanent, or final protective order issued pursuant to chapter 9A.44, 9A.46, 10.99, or 26.09 RCW or any of the former chapters 7.90, 10.14, and 26.50 RCW, or violation of a domestic violence protection order, sexual assault protection order, or antiharassment protection order issued under chapter 7.105 RCW;

(37) Unlawful discharge of a laser in the first degree (RCW 9A.49.020);

(38) Unlawful discharge of a laser in the second degree (RCW 9A.49.030); and

(39) Felony hazing (RCW 28B.10.901(2)(b)).

[ 2023 c 196 s 4; 2022 c 231 s 15; (2022 c 231 s 14 expired July 1, 2022); 2021 c 215 s 109; 2019 c 271 s 8; 2006 c 138 s 21; 2004 c 94 s 4; 1999 c 180 s 7; 1997 c 338 s 52. Prior: 1994 c 271 s 802; 1994 c 121 s 2; prior: 1992 c 186 s 4; 1992 c 145 s 12; 1988 c 145 s 15; 1985 c 288 s 6.]

NOTES:

Short title—2023 c 196: See note following RCW 28B.10.901.

Effective date—2022 c 231 ss 8, 9, 11, 13, and 15: See note following RCW 7.105.010.

Expiration date—2022 c 231 ss 7, 10, 12, 14, 16, and 17: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Severability—Effective dates—2004 c 94: See notes following RCW 9A.90.120.

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.

Purpose—Severability—1994 c 271: See notes following RCW 9A.28.020.

Severability—1992 c 186: See note following RCW 9A.46.110.

Effective date—Savings—Application—1988 c 145: See notes following RCW 9A.44.010.